Nebraska, session 109, LB348.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB348 LB348
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $3,000,000 from the
Health and Human Services Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $3,000,000 from
the Health and Human Services Cash Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department
of Health and Human Services, for Program 354, for domestic violence
services.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-